Hawaii statutes.
§334-127 Disposition. (a) If after
hearing all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic
examination ordered by the family court, the family court finds that the
subject of the petition does not meet the criteria for assisted community
treatment, the family court shall dismiss the petition.

(b) If after hearing all relevant evidence,
including the results of any diagnostic examination ordered by the family
court, the family court finds that the criteria for assisted community treatment
under section 334-121(1) have been met beyond a reasonable doubt and that the
criteria under section 334-121(2) to 334-121(7) have been met by clear and
convincing evidence, the family court shall order the subject to obtain
assisted community treatment for a period of not more than one year. The
written treatment plan submitted pursuant to section 334-126(h) shall be
attached to the order and made a part of the order.

If the family court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the beneficial mental and physical effects of
recommended medication outweigh the detrimental mental and physical effects, if
any, the order may authorize types or classes of medication to be included in
treatment at the discretion of the treating psychiatrist.

The court order shall also state who should
receive notice of intent to discharge early in the event that the treating
psychiatrist determines, prior to the end of the court ordered period of
treatment, that the subject should be discharged early from assisted community
treatment.

(c) The family court shall also designate on
the order the treating psychiatrist who is to be responsible for the management
and supervision of the subject's treatment, or shall assign an administrator of
a designated mental health program to, in turn, designate the treating
psychiatrist during the treatment period without court approval, and may
designate either a publicly employed psychiatrist, or a private psychiatrist,
provided that the private psychiatrist shall agree to the designation. The
order for assisted community treatment shall be subject to the Health Care
Privacy Harmonization Act, [chapter 323B].

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
subject's stipulation to the continuance [of] an existing court order. [L 1984,
c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§13, 24; am L 2016, c 114, §§3, 6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next